Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2410.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The following sums, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated from the restricted revenue account within the General Fund and from Federal augmentation funds to the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission to provide for the operation of the commission for the fiscal year July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027, for the purposes and in the amounts shown:Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the proper operation and administration of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, 123456789101112131415161718 including the chairman and commissioners and the Bureau of Safety and Enforcement.State appropriation............ 98,102,000The following Federal augmentation amounts, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated to supplement the sum authorized to be billed to utilities for the operation of the commission:(1) "Natural Gas Pipeline Safety" - To enforce the regulations of the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act.Federal appropriation........... 5,383,000(2) "IRA - TRANSMISSION SITING PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION........... 1,500,000Any Federal funds which the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission receives pursuant to these appropriations shall not be reimbursed to any utility.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2410PN3490 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324